Utah statutes.
13-42-140.   Transitional provisions -- Application to existing transactions.

(1)  Transactions entered into before July 1, 2007 and the rights, duties, and interests resulting from them may be completed, terminated, or enforced as required or permitted by a law amended, repealed, or modified by this chapter as though the amendment, repeal, or modification had not occurred.

(2) (a)  A person registered under Chapter 21, Credit Services Organizations Act, on June 30, 2007, that is required to be registered under this chapter on July 1, 2007, shall be considered to be registered under this chapter until the license in effect on June 30, 2007, expires.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), except for the registration requirement, a person subject to this chapter shall comply with this chapter for any transaction entered into on or after July 1, 2007.



Enacted by Chapter 154, 2006 General Session

